District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.24

Duties of hospitals and hospices.

(a)

Whenever a patient of a hospital or hospice dies, is determined to be a suitable candidate for organ or tissue donation, and has not made an anatomical gift by will or document of gift, a representative of the hospital or hospice shall, in accordance with § 7-1531.08, request a person authorized by that section to consent to an anatomical gift of all or part of the decedent’s body.

(b)

The request required by subsection (a) of this section shall be made only if a procurement organization has notified the hospital or hospice that a donation can be properly obtained and used in a manner consistent with accepted medical standards.

(c)

Upon the discovery of a properly executed document of gift or the receipt of a consent under subsection (a) of this section, a hospital or hospice shall immediately notify a procurement organization and shall cooperate in procuring the anatomical gift.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 25, 55 DCR 2532

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1531.25, § 7-1531.26, and § 7-1531.27.